Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.772

[Art. 115] Malingering.

Any person subject to this code who for the purpose of avoiding work, duty or service in the organized militia:

(1) Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse or derangement; or

(2) Intentionally inflicts self-injury;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 69; 1963 c 220 s 112.]